Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
Lease or Rental of Certain State-Owned Lands in Jackson

§ 29-1-201.
Authorization to lease or rent certain state-owned lands located in Jackson; terms, purpose.

The Governor’s Office of General Services is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to lease for a period of not more than fifteen (15) years all or any part of those lands originally leased for ninety-nine (99) years as authorized by an act of the Legislature on March 2, 1875, the same appearing as Chapter LXII, Laws of 1875; said lands lying and being situated in the City of Jackson, First Judicial District, State of Mississippi; or to lease such lands to a public service corporation serving the general public of the State of Mississippi in the City of Jackson, the lease not to exceed a period of twenty-five (25) years; or to rent on a monthly basis the said lands; said rental or lease to be subject to the following terms and conditions applicable thereto:

That the Governor’s Office of General Services find and determine that the said lands, or parts thereof, are neither now needed nor are they programmed by the State of Mississippi for governmental purposes within the period of the proposed term of said lease or rental.

That any lease period shall be computed from the expiration of the present lease, if any, on said lands.

That the annual amount paid for leased lands be in an amount of not less than seven and one-half percent (7-1/2%) of the current fair market value as determined by the averaging of at least two (2) appraisals by members of the American Institute of Real Estate Appraisers or the Society of Real Estate Appraisers. The said appraisals shall be made not later than six (6) months prior to the expiration of any existing lease, and the said appraisals shall be made available to all interested parties. Thereafter, appraisals on said property may be made every five (5) years (computed from the date of the beginning of each such lease) at the insistence of either party and at the cost of the party demanding same, and the annual dollar rent shall be adjusted in accordance with said appraisal. All such appraisals shall be based on land value less any improvements that may have been heretofore added by the leaseholder in possession, or that hereafter be added by the leaseholder in possession; provided, however, that all improvements permanently affixed to any of the said lands under lease or rental as provided for herein shall become the property of the State of Mississippi upon final termination of such lease or rental.

That the present holders under the unexpired terms of the existing leases shall have the first right and option to re-lease such lands, as they now may hold, provided that the existing leaseholders agree to pay rent at an annual amount of not less than seven and one-half percent (7-1/2%) of the fair market value of the property as determined by the terms and conditions stated in paragraph (c) of this subsection, and the re-leasing of such lands shall be subject to the other terms and conditions stated in this section. Consideration may be given to the present leaseholders under the existing leases in determining the term of the lease period to be granted under the first right and option as herein provided.

That in the case of monthly rental of said lands or any part thereof, the Governor’s Office of General Services is authorized to make such terms and agreements as to the amount and conditions thereof, and to follow such procedure as will insure that a fair and equitable return to the state is effectuated thereby.

That in the event the Governor’s Office of General Services is unable to lease the said lands as hereinabove provided or in the event the present leaseholders fail to exercise their option to re-lease, then in that event the Governor’s Office of General Services shall, by public notice, offer the said lands to the highest and best bidder therefor; with said notice being published in one or more newspapers of general circulation in each existing congressional district; provided, however, the Governor’s Office of General Services shall reserve unto itself the right to reject any or all such bids.

That any present leaseholder of said lands who desires to exercise his right to first option to re-lease, as provided for herein, shall notify the Governor’s Office of General Services in writing of his intent to exercise that right not later than three (3) months after the said appraisals provided for in subsection (c) are made available.

That any lease or rental contract or agreement entered into by virtue of this section shall be approved as to form by the Public Procurement Review Board before the same is to be effective.

That all monies derived from the lease, rental, sale or conveyance of such lands be deposited in the state land acquisition fund, which may be utilized for the purchase of additional state lands where authorized by act of the Legislature, for necessary repairs or renovations to facilities on such lands, or for appraisals, studies and other consulting costs related to the potential development, marketing, sale or long-term lease of such lands.

That the Governor’s Office of General Services is authorized to borrow money from the Mississippi Development Bank or other financial institution for the purpose of renovation of vacant buildings or portions thereof on such lands and lease the same in an amount less than that required under paragraph (c) of this subsection under the following conditions:

The lease is made to a public service corporation serving the general public of the State of Mississippi in the City of Jackson;

The lease payments over the initial lease term cover the actual costs of renovation including any interest and fees as well as all costs of the Governor’s Office of General Services for utilities, maintenance and security over the lease term; and

The lease may be subsequently renewed for additional periods not to exceed fifteen (15) years each for an annual amount to be renegotiated and set by the Governor’s Office of General Services.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the sale or transfer of title to the said lands.

It is the intent and purpose of this section to provide a fair and equitable return for the lease or rental of the said seat of government lands, and to afford lessees holding existing leases the first right and option to lease the same lands that they presently hold so as to continue any business or other utilization of the said lands not to exceed the periods provided for herein; and the Governor’s Office of General Services is hereby empowered and authorized to follow such procedure and to make such arrangements, not inconsistent with the provisions here, as may be reasonably necessary to effect such purpose and intent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 475, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 309; Laws, 1988, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 477, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 29-1-203.
Authorization to lease or rent additional state-owned lands located in Jackson; terms; purpose.

The Governor’s Office of General Services is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to lease for a period of not more than twenty (20) years with an option to renew for a period of twenty (20) years all, or to rent on a monthly basis any part, of those lands being part of the southwest corner of Section 14, Township 6 North, Range 1 East, in the City of Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi, and being more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at southwest corner of West Broadmoor Subdivision, as recorded in Plat Book 6, Page 35, in the office of the Chancery Clerk of Hinds County, Mississippi, and run thence easterly along the south boundary of Lot I, of the aforesaid subdivision 261.4 feet to the western right-of-way line of North State Street, run thence southwesterly along the western right-of-way line of North State Street, 111 feet, run thence westerly 242 feet, more or less to the point of beginning.

The rental or lease shall be subject to the following terms and conditions:

That the Governor’s Office of General Services find and determine that the said lands, or parts thereof, are neither now needed nor are they programmed by the State of Mississippi for governmental purposes within the period of the proposed term of said lease or rental.

That the annual amount paid for leased lands be in an amount of not less than seven and one-half percent (71/2%) of the current fair market value as determined by the averaging of at least two (2) appraisals. Thereafter, appraisals on said property may be made every five (5) years (computed from the date of the beginning of each such lease) at the insistence of either party and at the cost of the party demanding same, and the annual rental shall be adjusted in accordance with said appraisal. All such appraisals shall be based on land value less any improvements that may have been heretofore added by the leaseholder in possession, or that may hereafter be added by the leaseholder in possession; provided, however, that all improvements permanently affixed to any of the said lands under lease or rental as provided for herein shall become the property of the State of Mississippi upon final termination of such lease or rental.

That in the case of monthly rental of said lands or any part thereof, the Governor’s Office of General Services be authorized to make such terms and agreements as to the amount and conditions thereof, and to follow such procedures as will insure a fair and equitable return to the state.

That all lease and rental monies from any such leases or rentals be deposited in the state land acquisition fund.

That nothing in this section be construed to authorize the sale or transfer of title to the said lands.

It is the intent and purpose of this section to provide a fair and equitable return for the lease or rental of said state lands. The Governor’s Office of General Services is hereby empowered and authorized to follow such procedures and to make such arrangements, not inconsistent with the provisions here, as may be reasonably necessary to effect such purpose and intent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 460, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 380, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 29-1-205.
Lease of certain land in Jackson to national educational honor fraternity.

The Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to sell and convey on behalf of the State of Mississippi to a nationally recognized organization which has as its purpose the recognition and promotion of scholarship, leadership and service among two-year college students throughout the country for the purpose of constructing a national headquarters thereon, the following described state-owned lands. The property authorized to be sold and conveyed is a certain parcel of land situated in the Northwest 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 25, T6N, R1E, Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi, and being more particularly described as follows, to wit:

Commence at the Southwest corner of Lot 2 of Northeast Heights, a subdivision on file and of record in the Office of the Chancery Clerk at Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi, in Plat Book 10 at page 45; run thence Southerly along the extension of the West line of said Lot 2 for a distance of 80.00 feet to a point on the South line of Eastover Drive; turn thence right through a deflection angle of 89 degrees 13 minutes and run westerly along the South line of Eastover Drive for a distance of 43.84 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING; thence leaving said South line of Eastover Drive, turn left through a deflection angle of 95 degrees 41 minutes 50 seconds and run Southerly along a line twenty-five feet from and parallel to the centerline of a 31 foot asphalt drive for a distance of 118.08 feet; turn thence right through a deflection angle of 3 degrees 07 minutes 37 seconds and continue Southerly along a line twenty-five feet from and parallel to the centerline of a 31 foot asphalt drive for a distance of 132.71 feet to a point on the North line of a United Gas Pipe Line Company easement; turn thence right through a deflection angle of 59 degrees 18 minutes 47 seconds and run Southwesterly along the North line of said United Gas Pipe Line Company easement for a distance of 520.00 feet; turn thence right through a deflection angle of 90 degrees 00 minutes 00 seconds and run Northwesterly for a distance of 410.00 feet; turn thence right through a deflection angle of 69 degrees 42 minutes 33 seconds and run Northeasterly for a distance of 238.99 feet to a point on the South line of said Eastover Drive; said point further being on a 2 degrees 27 minutes curve bearing to the right, said curve having a central angle of 8 degrees 58 minutes 45 seconds and a radius of 2258.60 feet; turn thence right through a deflection angle of 53 degrees 12 minutes 08 seconds and run Easterly along the chord of said 2 degrees 27 minutes curve bearing to the right and the South line of said Eastover Drive for a distance of 27.26 feet to the Point of Tangency; turn thence right through a deflection angle of 00 degrees 20 minutes 45 seconds and run Easterly along the South line said Eastover Drive for a distance of 472.74 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 5.44 acres more or less.

The Legislature recognizes that Mississippi’s public two-year college system is the oldest system of its kind in the nation, and further recognizes that this system enjoys national notoriety and respect for its achievement and promotion of educational, civic, social and cultural excellence. The Legislature declares and finds that the purpose of this legislation is to promote, enhance and foster continued excellence in Mississippi’s two-year college system and the overall educational development and improvement of the State of Mississippi and the educational, civic, social, cultural, moral and economic welfare thereof, and that such purposes will be accomplished by the conveyance of the above-described property to an organization within the aforesaid classification for construction of a national headquarters thereon.

The conveyance to be executed by the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, shall be within the limits contained in Sections 29-1-205 and 29-1-209 and contain a provision reserving unto the state all oil, gas and mineral rights of every kind and character. The conveyance shall make provision for reasonable access to the conveyed premises over existing roadways and to existing utility lines for the benefit of the conveyed premises. The conveyance shall include terms granting to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, to the Mississippi Community College Board and to the Mississippi Authority for Educational Television reasonable rights to utilize the improvements to be constructed thereon, or portions thereof, for conference or meeting purposes, specifying the architectural style of the improvements and providing a reasonable setback of wooded undeveloped property contiguous to the improvements in order to maintain the natural environment of the site.

The conveyance herein shall be for such consideration as determined appropriate by the Public Procurement Review Board. Such consideration may be paid or provided in installments over a period of time (not to exceed twenty-five (25) years) and may also be provided in kind. In kind consideration may include the reasonable use of the improvements constructed on the property by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and its institutions, the Mississippi Community College Board and the community and junior colleges, and the Mississippi Authority for Educational Television and other state agencies, and the provision of leadership training certification programs for community and junior college faculty and others. Such in kind consideration may also constitute full and fair consideration for the property. In establishing consideration, the board may take into account the appraised value of the property, but shall allow reasonable credit to the purchaser for benefits accruing to the State of Mississippi, including the enhancement of the state’s community and junior college program and the promotion of excellence in public education afforded by the location of such organization and its headquarters in this state, the increase in employment made possible, and that the only use which can be made of the conveyed premises is for the organization’s national headquarters with reversion to the state otherwise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 564, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 516, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 397, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 29-1-207.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 516, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1995).

§29-1-207. [Laws, 1989, ch. 564, § 2].

§ 29-1-209.
Use of property leased; reversion of property to state.

It is expressly provided and stipulated that the land which is conveyed pursuant to Section 29-1-205 and this section shall be used in the furtherance of the work of the organization and with the understanding that if or when the property is no longer used exclusively for that purpose that the title to the property and all improvements, rights and appurtenances thereon shall revert to and be vested in the State of Mississippi, under the following condition: Consideration for the reversion of any improvements constructed on the property by the organization shall be paid by the State of Mississippi to the organization from any funds appropriated or otherwise made available for such purpose. Consideration for such reversion shall be the average of the fair market value of such improvements as determined by two (2) professional property appraisers, one (1) of whom to be selected by the Department of Finance and Administration and one (1) of whom to be selected by the organization, who are certified and licensed by the Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board. Appraisal fees shall be paid by the selecting party. Fair consideration shall also be paid by the State of Mississippi for any payments made by the nationally recognized organization to the state for the purchase of such property.

It is expressly provided that the land which is conveyed pursuant to Section 29-1-205 and this section shall automatically revert to and be vested in the state if construction of the national headquarters has not commenced within two (2) years from the conveyance of such property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 564, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1995).

§ 29-1-211.
Exemption from ad valorem taxation.

The conveyance of the property pursuant to Sections 29-1-205 and 29-1-209, being for the aforesaid public purpose, the property and any improvements located thereon are exempted from ad valorem taxation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 516, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1995).